Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202685-1501
Declaration of intent and purpose.

The Legislature hereby declares that for a community college to be truly responsible to the people it serves, primary control of such colleges shall be placed in the citizens within the local area so served subject to coordination by the Coordinating Commission for Postsecondary Education. It is the intent and purpose of sections 85-1501 to 85-1539 to create locally governed and locally supported community college areas with the major educational emphasis on occupational education. Each community college area is intended to be an independent, local, unique, and vital segment of postsecondary education separate from both the established elementary and secondary school system and from other institutions of postsecondary education and is not to be converted into a four-year, baccalaureate-degree-granting institution.

Laws 1975, LB 344, § 1;

Laws 1988, LB 802, § 29;

Laws 1991, LB 663, § 44;

R.S.Supp.,1992, § 79-2636;

Laws 1993, LB 239, § 23;

Laws 1997, LB 269, § 66;

Laws 2026, LB1072, § 218.
July 1, 2026
Chapter 79, article 26, the Technical Community College Area Act, is not in violation of Article VIII, section 1A, of the Constitution. State ex rel. Western Technical Com. Col. Area v. Tallon, 196 Neb. 603, 244 N.W.2d 183 (1976).